Utah statutes.
78A-2-227.5.   Public policy regarding guardian ad litem -- Training.

(1)  A guardian ad litem may not presume that a child and the child's parent are adversaries.

(2)  A guardian ad litem shall be trained in:

(a)  the parental rights and child and family protection principles provided in Section 62A-4a-201;

(b)  the fundamental liberties of parents and the public policy of the state to support family unification to the fullest extent possible;

(c)  the constitutionally protected rights of parents, in cases where the state is a party; and

(d)  the use of a least restrictive means analysis regarding state claims of a compelling child welfare interest.



Enacted by Chapter 223, 2012 General Session

